Utah statutes.
53-3-219 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Suspension of minor's driving privileges.

(1)  The division shall immediately suspend all driving privileges of any person upon receipt of an order suspending driving privileges under Section 32A-12-209, Section 32A-12-209.5, Subsection 76-9-701(1), or Section 78A-6-606.

(2) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), upon receipt of the first order suspending a person's driving privileges under Section 32A-12-209 or 32A-12-209.5, Subsection 76-9-701(1), or Section 78A-6-606 for a violation that was committed on or after July 1, 2009, the division shall:

(A)  impose a suspension for a period of one year;

(B)  if the person has not been issued an operator license, deny the person's application for a license or learner's permit for a period of one year; or

(C)  if the person is under the age of eligibility for a driver license, deny the person's application for a license or learner's permit beginning on the date of conviction and continuing for one year beginning on the date of eligibility for a driver license.

(ii)  Upon receipt of the first order suspending a person's driving privileges under this section, the division shall reduce the suspension period under Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A), (B), or (C) if ordered by the court in accordance with Subsection 32A-12-209(5)(b), 32A-12-209.5(4)(b), 76-9-701(4)(b), or 78A-6-606(3)(b).

(b)  Upon receipt of a second or subsequent order suspending a person's driving privileges under Section 32A-12-209 or 32A-12-209.5, Subsection 76-9-701(1), or Section 78A-6-606 for a violation that was committed on or after July 1, 2009, the division shall:

(i)  impose a suspension for a period of two years; or

(ii)  if the person has not been issued an operator license or is under the age of eligibility for a driver license, deny the person's application for a license or learner's permit for a period of two years.

(c)  The Driver License Division shall impose a suspension for the suspension period in effect prior to July 1, 2009, if the order suspending driving privileges under Section 32A-12-209 or 32A-12-209.5, Subsection 76-9-701(1), or Section 78A-6-606 is for a violation committed prior to July 1, 2009.

(3)  The Driver License Division shall subtract from any suspension or revocation period for a conviction of a violation of Section 32A-12-209 the number of days for which a license was previously suspended under Section 53-3-231, if the previous sanction was based on the same occurrence upon which the record of conviction is based.

(4)  After reinstatement of the license under Subsection (1)(a), a report authorized under Section 53-3-104 may not contain evidence of the suspension of a minor's license under this section if the minor has not been convicted of any other offense for which the suspension under Subsection (1)(a) may be extended.

